ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 농구: 농구 의류; 농구 가방; 농구 링 부품/부대용품; 농구 링; 농구 보호 장구; 농구화; 농구 훈련 장비; 농구공
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Basketball: Basketball-Bekleidung; Basketballtaschen; Basketballkorbteile & -zubehör; Basketballkörbe; Basketball-Schutzausrüstung; Basketballschuhe; Basketball-Trainingshilfen; Basketbälle
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Basketbal: Basketbalové oblečení; Tašky na basketbal; Díly a příslušenství k basketbalovým košům; Basketbalové koše; Basketbalové chrániče; Boty na basketbal; Tréninkové pomůcky na basketbal; Basketbalové míče
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 篮球用品: 篮球服; 篮球包; 篮球框铁环零件/配件; 篮球框铁环; 篮球防护装备; 篮球鞋; 棒球训练辅助设备; 篮球
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Basketbal: Basketbalové oblečenie; Basketbalové vaky; Diely a príslušenstvo k basketbalovým košom; Basketbalové koše; Ochranné vybavenie na basketbal; Basketbalová obuv; Basketbalové tréningové pomôcky; Basketbalové lopty
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Mingi de baschet: Îmbrăcăminte de baschet; Genți pentru baschet; Piese și accesorii pentru coșul de baschet; Coșuri de baschet; Echipamente de protecție pentru baschet; Pantofi de baschet; Articole antrenament baschet; Mingi de baschet
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng rổ: Trang phục bóng rổ; Túi đựng bóng rổ; Linh kiện & Phụ kiện vành bóng rổ; Vành bóng rổ; Đồ bảo hộ chơi bóng rổ; Giày chơi bóng rổ; Thiết bị đào tạo bóng rổ; Quả bóng rổ
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Basketball: Basketball Apparel; Basketball Bags; Basketball Hoop Parts & Accessories; Basketball Hoops; Basketball Protective Gear; Basketball Shoes; Basketball Training Aids; Basketballs
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Basketball: Basketballklær; Basketballbager; Kurvdeler og -tilbehør for basketball; Basketballkurver; Beskyttelsesutstyr for basketball; Basketballsko; Opplæringshjelp for basketball; Basketballer
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Basketbal: Basketbalkleding; Basketbaltassen; Onderdelen en accessoires voor basketbalringen; Basketbalstaanders; Beschermende kleding voor basketbal; Basketbalschoenen; Hulpmiddelen voor basketbaltraining; Basketballen
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Basket: Abbigliamento da basket; Borse da basket; Parti e accessori canestro basket; Canestri da basket; Protezioni da basket; Scarpe da basket; Supporti di allenamento per il basket; Palle da basket
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Krepšinis: Krepšinio apranga; Krepšinio krepšiai; Krepšinio lankų dalys ir priedai; Krepšinio krepšiai; Krepšinio apsauginė įranga; Krepšinio bateliai; Krepšinio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Krepšinio kamuoliai
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Košarka: Košarkaška odjeća; Torbe za košarku; Dijelovi i dodaci za košarkaški obruč; Koševi za košarku; Zaštitna oprema za košarku; Tenisice za košarku; Pomagala za košarkaški trening; Košarkaške lopte
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Basketboll: Basketkläder; Basketväskor; Delar och tillbehör till basketkorgar; Basketkorgar; Skyddsutrustning för basket; Basketskor; Träningshjälpmedel för basketboll; Basketbollar
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Basketball: Basketballtøj; Basketballtasker; Basketballkurve – dele og tilbehør; Basketballkurve; Beskyttelsesudstyr til basketball; Basketballsko; Træningsudstyr til basketball; Bolde til basketball
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 籃球: 籃球服飾; 籃球袋; 籃球框零件/配件; 籃球框; 籃球護具; 籃球鞋; 棒球訓練輔助用具; 籃球用球
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Basquete: Vestuário de basquete; Bolsas de basquete; Peças e acessórios do aro da cesta de basquete; Cestas de basquete; Equipamento de proteção para basquete; Tênis de Basquete; Equipamentos auxiliares para treinar basquete; Bolas de basquete
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Basketbol: Basketbol giyim ürünleri; Basketbol çantaları; Basketbol Potası Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Basketbol Potaları; Basketbol koruyucu ekipmanları; Basketbol Ayakkabıları; Basketbol Eğitim Araçları; Basketbol Topları
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Баскетбол: Баскетболно облекло; Баскетболни чанти; Части и аксесоари за баскетболен кош; Баскетболни кошове; Защитна екипировка за баскетбол; Баскетболни обувки; Помощни средства за баскетболна тренировка; Баскетболни топки
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > バスケットボール: バスケットボールウェア; バスケットボールバッグ; バスケットゴール関連用品; バスケットゴール; バスケットボール用プロテクター; バスケットボールシューズ; バスケットボール練習器具; バスケットボール
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Baloncesto: Ropa para básquetbol; Bolsos para básquetbol; Piezas y accesorios para canastas de baloncesto; Canastas de baloncesto; Equipo de protección para básquetbol; Calzado de baloncesto; Accesorios para entrenamiento de baloncesto; Pelotas de baloncesto
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Μπάσκετ: Ένδυση μπάσκετ; Τσάντες μπάσκετ; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ στεφάνης μπάσκετ; Καλάθια μπάσκετ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μπάσκετ; Παπούτσια μπάσκετ; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης μπάσκετ; Μπάλες μπάσκετ
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basquetebol: Vestuário de basquetebol; Sacos de basquetebol; Acessórios e peças para aro de basquetebol; Aros para basquetebol; Equipamento de proteção de basquetebol; Calçado de basquetebol; Auxiliares de treino para basquetebol; Bolas de basquetebol
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > บาสเก็ตบอล: เครื่องแต่งกายบาสเกตบอล; กระเป๋าใส่ลูกบาสเกตบอล; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ห่วงบาสเกตบอล; ห่วงของบาสเกตบอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันตัวบาสเกตบอล; รองเท้าบาสเกตบอล; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมบาสเกตบอล; ลูกบาสเกตบอล
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Koszykówka: Odzież do koszykówki; Torby do koszykówki; Części i akcesoria do koszy; Kosze do gry w koszykówkę; Sprzęt ochronny do koszykówki; Buty do koszykówki; Sprzęt treningowy do koszykówki; Piłki do koszykówki
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Košarka: Košarkarska oblačila; Vreče za košarkarske žoge; Deli in dodatki za košarkarske obroče; Košarkaški obroči; Košarka Zaščitna oprema; Košarkarski copati; Pripomočki za vadbo košarke; Košarkarske žoge
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Basket-ball: Vêtements de basket-ball; Sacs de basket-ball; Accessoires et paniers de basket-ball; Paniers de basket-ball; Équipement de protection de basket-ball; Chaussures de basket-ball; Matériel d'entraînement de basket-ball; Ballons de basket-ball
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Koripallo: Koripallovaatteet; Koripallokassit; Koripallokorin osat ja tarvikkeet; Koripallokorit; Koripallon suojavarusteet; Koripallokengät; Koripallon harjoitusvälineet; Koripallot
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Kosárlabda: Kosárlabda ruházat; Kosárlabdatáskák; Kosárlabdakarika-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Kosárlabdakarikák; Kosárlabda védőfelszerelések; Kosárlabdacipők; Kosárlabda-edzéssegédek; Kosárlabdák
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Баскетбол: Баскетбольная одежда; Сумки для баскетбола; Детали и аксессуары для баскетбольных щитов и корзин; Баскетбольные корзины; Баскетбольная защитная экипировка; Обувь для баскетбола; Тренировочный инвентарь для баскетбола; Баскетбольные мячи